dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="t/ajn__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ajn</l><r>ajn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jun</l><r>ajn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/arba__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arba</l><r>arba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rabi</l><r>arba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/orġ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orġ</l><r>orġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raġ</l><r>orġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nt/iena__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iena</l><r>iena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjen</l><r>iena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/anek__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>anek</l><r>anek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niek</l><r>anek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nieki</l><r>anek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z/appun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>appun</l><r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>papen</l><r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>piepen</l><r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/eddum__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eddum</l><r>eddum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>diedem</l><r>eddum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tr/offa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>offa</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uf</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/uħ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uħ</l><r>uħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wieħ</l><r>uħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/wiċċ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>wiċċ</l><r>wiċċ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uċuħ</l><r>wiċċ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħof/ra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>or</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/ummiena__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ummiena</l><r>ummiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>miemen</l><r>ummiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/oxra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>oxra</l><r>oxra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>xur</l><r>oxra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ider__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ider</l><r>ider<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idra</l><r>ider<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/iblaq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iblaq</l><r>iblaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>boloq</l><r>iblaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/awra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>awra</l><r>awra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wawar</l><r>awra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/era__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>era</l><r>era<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>irja</l><r>era<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/ani__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>ani</l><r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onja</l><r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/orti__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orti</l><r>orti<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rati</l><r>orti<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/arfett__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arfett</l><r>arfett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riefet</l><r>arfett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/artell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>artell</l><r>artell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ratel</l><r>artell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rietel</l><r>artell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/eċluq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eċluq</l><r>eċluq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċielaq</l><r>eċluq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ellieqa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ellieqa</l><r>ellieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lielaq</l><r>ellieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rħ/is__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/isem__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>isem</l><r>isem<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isma</l><r>isem<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/asam__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>asam</l><r>asam<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>osma</l><r>asam<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skr/un__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>un</l><r>un<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjen</l><r>un<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/urdien__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urdien</l><r>urdien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieden</l><r>urdien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/aħnan__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħnan</l><r>aħnan<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħaħan</l><r>aħnan<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħaħen</l><r>aħnan<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/urqax__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urqax</l><r>urqax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raqax</l><r>urqax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieqax</l><r>urqax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieqex</l><r>urqax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="el/f__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>f</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uf</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/anbur__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>anbur</l><r>anbur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nabar</l><r>anbur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fl/us__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjes</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fli/xkun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>xkun</l><r>xkun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>exken</l><r>xkun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fir/ma__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ma</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>em</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v/erdun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erdun</l><r>erdun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieden</l><r>erdun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/omna__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>omna</l><r>omna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mien</l><r>omna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/ibsa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ibsa</l><r>ibsa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bies</l><r>ibsa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sorra"><i>sor</i><par n="ħof/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ruħ"><i>r</i><par n="r/uħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="zappun"><i>z</i><par n="z/appun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="baħnan"><i>b</i><par n="b/aħnan__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kartell"><i>k</i><par n="k/artell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="firma"><i>fir</i><par n="fir/ma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="peċluq"><i>p</i><par n="p/eċluq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għani"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ani__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="geddum"><i>g</i><par n="g/eddum__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="troffa"><i>tr</i><par n="tr/offa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġisem"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/isem__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="libsa"><i>l</i><par n="l/ibsa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żellieqa"><i>ż</i><par n="t/ellieqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rħis"><i>rħ</i><par n="rħ/is__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="verdun"><i>v</i><par n="v/erdun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skrun"><i>skr</i><par n="skr/un__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qorti"><i>q</i><par n="q/orti__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tellieqa"><i>t</i><par n="t/ellieqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tanbur"><i>t</i><par n="t/anbur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qasam"><i>q</i><par n="q/asam__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="darba"><i>d</i><par n="d/arba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dawra"><i>d</i><par n="f/awra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="borġ"><i>b</i><par n="b/orġ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħofra"><i>ħof</i><par n="ħof/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="elf"><i>el</i><par n="el/f__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="farfett"><i>f</i><par n="f/arfett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tomna"><i>t</i><par n="t/omna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="flixkun"><i>fli</i><par n="fli/xkun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħanek"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/anek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġummiena"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ummiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="burqax"><i>b</i><par n="b/urqax__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fawra"><i>f</i><par n="f/awra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="flus"><i>fl</i><par n="fl/us__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tajn"><i>t</i><par n="t/ajn__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="wiċċ"><i></i><par n="/wiċċ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġurdien"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/urdien__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mera"><i>m</i><par n="m/era__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ntiena"><i>nt</i><par n="nt/iena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="iblaq"><i></i><par n="/iblaq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sider"><i>s</i><par n="s/ider__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="inforra"><i>infor</i><par n="ħof/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qoxra"><i>q</i><par n="q/oxra__n_GD"/></e>
